Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1114.01
County officers; salaries; classification of counties.

For the purpose of fixing the salaries of certain officers and their deputies, counties shall be classified as follows: Counties having a population of less than three thousand inhabitants, Class 1; three thousand and less than nine thousand inhabitants, Class 2; nine thousand and less than fourteen thousand inhabitants, Class 3; fourteen thousand and less than twenty thousand inhabitants, Class 4; twenty thousand and less than sixty thousand inhabitants, Class 5; sixty thousand and less than two hundred thousand inhabitants, Class 6; and counties of two hundred thousand inhabitants or more, Class 7.

Laws 1961, c. 96, § 1, p. 324;

Laws 1971, LB 856, § 1.